Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3314
Unlicensed assistant, defined.

Unlicensed assistant means an individual who is not a licensed veterinarian, a licensed veterinary technician, or a licensed animal therapist and who is working in veterinary medicine. Unlicensed assistant does not include a person engaged in equine, cat, and dog massage practice.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1096;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB596, § 4.